Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 106 The Performance Incentive Funding Act of 2016

16-106-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as “The Performance Incentive Funding Act of 2016.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 521, § 1.

16-106-2.
Public postsecondary performance incentive funding.

The commissioner of postsecondary education is hereby directed to implement a performance incentive funding formula that meets the requirements of this chapter, in consultation with the council on postsecondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 521, § 1.

16-106-3.
Performance incentive funding — Community College of Rhode Island.

Beginning in FY 2018, funding for the Community College of Rhode Island (“CCRI”) shall include a performance-based component utilizing all additional allocations of otherwise unrestricted, higher-education general revenue greater than the base amount received pursuant to the FY 2016 budget as enacted of total unrestricted state higher-education funding.

Data on which to base performance measures as described in subsection (c) shall be defined by the commissioner of postsecondary education, in consultation with the council on postsecondary education. Measures shall begin to be collected in FY 2017.

These measures may include and incorporate outcomes or goals from multiple, previous years. The lack of information from previous years, however, will not affect the use of performance-based measures.

The performance-based measures shall be consistent with the purpose, role, scope, and mission of CCRI, and shall include the following metrics:

For first-time, full-time students, the number and percentage, including growth thereof in relation to enrollment and in prior years, of associate’s degrees awarded to students within two (2) years and three (3) years, including summer graduates; for part-time students, performance-based measures shall be based on incremental milestones made toward achieving degree or certificate completion;

The number of one year or longer industry-recognized certificates earned by students within an expected amount of time, and weighted to increase high demand, high-wage field certificates consistent with CCRI’s purpose;

One measure, as agreed to by the commissioner of postsecondary education and the president of CCRI, who shall consider faculty, staff, and student input; and

Any other measures that are deemed appropriate by the council of postsecondary education.

Weight may be assigned to any of the aforementioned metrics to reinforce the purpose, role, scope, and mission of CCRI, the economic needs of the state, and the socio-economic status of the students. The commissioner may consider the college’s improvements in said metrics when determining whether the college has satisfied the annual measure despite not reaching the overall goal.

The commissioner shall provide faculty and students an opportunity to provide input on the development of performance measures.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 521, § 1.

16-106-4.
Performance incentive funding — Rhode Island College.

Beginning in FY 2018, funding for Rhode Island college (“RIC”) shall include a performance-based component utilizing all additional allocations of otherwise unrestricted, higher-education general revenue greater than the base amount received pursuant to the FY 2016 budget as enacted, of total unrestricted state higher-education funding.

Data on which to base performance measures as described in subsection (c) shall be defined by the commissioner of postsecondary education, in consultation with the council on postsecondary education. Measures shall begin to be collected in FY 2017.

These measures may include and incorporate outcomes or goals from multiple, previous years. The lack of information from previous years, however, will not affect the use of performance-based measures.

Rhode Island college shall have unique measures consistent with its purpose, role, scope, and mission. The performance-based measures shall include the following metrics:

The number and percentage, including growth in relation to enrollment and prior years of bachelor’s degrees awarded to first-time, full-time students within four (4) years and six (6) years, including summer graduates;

The number of degrees awarded that are tied to Rhode Island’s high demand, high-wage employment opportunities consistent with the institution’s mission;

One measure that applies only to RIC, as agreed to by the commissioner of postsecondary education and the president of RIC, who shall consider faculty, staff, and student input; and

Any other measures that are deemed appropriate by the council on postsecondary education.

Weight may be assigned to any of the aforementioned metrics to reinforce the mission of RIC, the economic needs of the state, and the socio-economic status of the students. The commissioner may consider the institution’s improvements in said metrics when determining whether it has satisfied the annual measure despite not reaching the overall goal.

The commissioner shall provide faculty and students an opportunity to provide input on the development of performance measures.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 521, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 10.

16-106-5.
Performance not achieved.

If a public institution of higher education has failed to achieve one or more of the performance metrics set forth in accordance with this chapter, the funds associated with each, unachieved metric shall be distributed to the same institution for corrective action, with oversight by the office of the postsecondary commissioner.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 521, § 1.

16-106-6.
Accountability — Authority to revise and transparency.

The commissioner of postsecondary education shall monitor, publish, and report to the council on postsecondary education the level of performance on all metrics identified in accordance with this chapter for the community college of Rhode Island, and Rhode Island college.

The commissioner of postsecondary education, in consultation with the council on postsecondary education, shall revise the metrics at a time when performance has reached a pre-defined level. Future metrics shall further goals identified by the board of education and the governor’s workforce board, and the applicable purpose and mission of the institution of higher education to which they apply.

Each public higher-education institution shall publish its performance on all of its associated metrics prescribed in this chapter on its website.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 521, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 10.

16-106-7.
State postsecondary education funding formula.

Implementation of a state postsecondary-education funding formula shall be contingent upon the approval of the general assembly. On or before October 1, 2016, the commissioner of postsecondary education shall present to the board of education and the general assembly, the following:

A proposal for the further definition of the budget for “otherwise unrestricted higher education general revenue” in accordance with §§

16-106-3(a)

and

16-106-4(a)

; and

With input from an advisory workgroup composed of representatives of the administration and faculty of Community College of Rhode Island, Rhode Island College, and University of Rhode Island, the commissioner shall develop a proposal for a funding formula for calculating budgetary needs of the public postsecondary institutions.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 521, § 1.